Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2073.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1611 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1611. Disqualification.* * *(r) Disqualification for disobedience to traffic-control devices.--The department shall disqualify a person from driving a commercial motor vehicle or school vehicle for life for a third or subsequent violation of section 3111(a.1)(1.1) (relating to obedience to traffic-control devices).Section 2. Section 3111(a.1) of Title 75 is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 3111. Obedience to traffic-control devices.12345678910111213141516171819 * * *(a.1) Penalty.--(1) [A] Except as provided for under paragraph (1.1), a person who violates this section commits a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, pay a fine of $150. No costs or surcharges imposed under 42 Pa.C.S. § 1725.1 (relating to costs) or section 6506 (relating to surcharge) shall be assessed or imposed upon a conviction under this section.(1.1) (i) A commercial driver's license holder who violates this section while operating a commercial motor vehicle commits a summary offense and shall, upon conviction:(A) For a first offense, pay a fine of $1,000.(B) For a second or subsequent offense, pay a fine of $5,000.(ii) In addition to the fines contained in subparagraph (i), the employer of a commercial driver's license holder convicted of violating this section shall pay an additional fine of $1,000 for the commercial driver's license holder's first offense and $5,000 for the commercial driver's license holder's second or subsequent offense. This subparagraph does not apply if the commercial driver's license holder and employer are the same person.(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including 42 Pa.C.S. § 3733(a) (relating to deposits into account), the [fine collected under paragraph (1)] fines collected under paragraphs (1) and (1.1) shall be deposited as follows:(i) Twenty-five dollars of the fine shall be 20250HB2073PN2656 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 deposited as provided under 42 Pa.C.S. § 3733(a).(ii) After deposit of the amount under subparagraph (i), the remaining portion of the fine shall be deposited into the Public Transportation Trust Fund.* * *(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commercial driver's license holder." As defined in section 1603 (relating to definitions)."Commercial motor vehicle." As defined in section 1603."Employer." As defined in section 1603.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2073PN2656 - 3 - 12345678910111213